Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
671

MEDICAL
TORTS

Part I. General Provisions

Section

671-1 Definitions

671-2 Repealed

671-3 Informed consent

671-4 Notice of damages

671-5 Reporting and reviewing medical tort
claims

671-6 Administration of chapter

671-7 Professional liability insurance;
coverage for

telehealth

Part II. Medical Inquiry and Conciliation

671-11 Medical inquiry and conciliation panels;
composition,

selection, compensation

671-11.5 Waiver of filing fee

671-12 Review by panel required;
notice; presentation of

inquiry; request for a more definite
statement of

the inquiry

671-12.5 Certificate of consultation

671-13 Medical inquiry and
conciliation panel proceedings;

voluntary settlement

671-14 Same; persons attending
proceedings of panel

671-15 Panel termination

671-15.5 Expungement of records; malpractice
insurance rates

671-16 Subsequent litigation; excluded evidence

671-16.5 Arbitration; subsequent litigation

671-16.6 Submission of inquiry to an
alternative dispute

resolution provider

671-17 Immunity of panel members from
liability

671-18 Statute of limitations tolled

671-19 Duty to cooperate; assessment of costs
and fees

671-20 Annual report

Part III. Patients' Compensation Fund--Repealed

671-31 to 37 Repealed

Case Notes

As chapter rationally furthers legitimate state interest of
assuring the provision of affordable health care to Hawaii's citizens by
requiring participation in medical malpractice dispute resolution such that the
high cost of litigation may be avoided, plaintiff not denied equal protection
of the laws. 89 H. 188, 970 P.2d 496 (1998).

Section 671-12(a) requires only that a claimant set forth
facts upon which the claim is based and include the names of all parties
against whom the claim is or may be made who are then known to the claimant;
nowhere in §671-12 does it require plaintiffs to name all known negligent health
care providers; having filed the requisite medical claim conciliation panel
claim, participated in the required hearing, and rejected the panel's finding
of no actionable negligence, plaintiffs satisfied this chapter's statutory
prerequisites for filing suit in circuit court. 111 H. 74, 137 P.3d 980 (2006).

Where defendant was a Hawaii nonprofit organization, which
served as the parent corporation of four affiliated hospitals in Hawaii,
including Kapiolani, a wholly-owned subsidiary of defendant, defendant was a
"health care provider" in the context of this chapter. 121 H. 235
(App.), 216 P.3d 1258 (2009).

Plaintiff's claims of neglect, abuse, and failure to provide
a safe home against care home defendants did not constitute "medical torts"
within the meaning of §671-1; thus, plaintiff was not required to submit
plaintiff's claims to a medical claim conciliation panel (MCCP) pursuant to
§§671-12 and 671-16 as a condition for plaintiff to file suit against
defendants, and the circuit court erred in dismissing plaintiff's suit based on
plaintiff's failure to submit plaintiff's claims to a MCCP. 128 H. 405 (App.),
289 P.3d 1041 (2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next